Maine, session 132, LD1225.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1019, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 417, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Possess an outstanding education loan relating to the an associate or bachelor's
degree of any kind or a master's or doctoral nursing degree; and
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §1019, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. CC, §2, is
further amended to read:
4. Administration. The nursing education loan repayment program and the nursing
education loan repayment fund are administered by the authority. The authority shall repay
the loan of an applicant who meets the criteria in subsection 2 in the amount of up to
$20,000 for a an associate, bachelor's or master's degree and up to $40,000 for a doctoral
degree for full-time nursing faculty and in the amount of up to $10,000 for a an associate,
bachelor's or master's degree and up to $20,000 for a doctoral degree for part-time nursing
faculty. The authority may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this subchapter. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.